pt-BR: Acessórios para processador de alimentos incluídos: Lâmina de corte; Acessório para espremer frutas cítricas; kit para cortar em cubos; Lâmina de massa; disco de batata frita; Disco de ralar; Tigela de fazer sorvete; Disco para julienne; Lâmina de amassar; Inserção para mini tigela; Disco de parmesão; Disco descascador; Centrífuga de salada; Disco de corte em tiras; Disco de corte; Disco espiralizador; Estojo de armazenamento; Batedor/disco emulsionante; Outro
de: Inbegriffenes Küchenmaschinenzubehör: Hackmesser; Zitruspresse-Aufsatz; Würfelset; Teigmesser; Pommes-Frites-Scheibe; Gitterscheibe; Speiseeisbereiterschüssel; Julienne-Schneidscheibe; Knetmesser; Mini-Schüssel-Einsatz; Parmesanscheibe; Schälscheibe; Salatschleuder; Raspelscheibe; Schneidscheibe; Spiralschneider; Aufbewahrungsbehälter; Emulgierscheibe; Sonstiges
pl: Akcesoria do robota kuchennego w zestawie: Nóż do siekania; Wyciskarka do cytrusów (nakładka); Zestaw do krojenia w kostkę; Nóż do ciasta; Tarcza do frytek; Tarcza do tarcia; Misa do lodów; Tarcza julienne; Nóż do zagniatania; Mini misa (wkład); Tarcza do parmezanu; Tarcza obierająca; Wirówka do sałaty; Tarcza do szatkowania; Tarcza do krojenia; Tarcza spiralizująca; Etui do przechowywania; Tarcza do ubijania / emulgowania; Pozostałe
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเครื่องเตรียมอาหารที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: ใบมีดสับ; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องคั้นน้ำผลไม้; ชุดอุปกรณ์หั่นเต๋า; ใบมีดนวดแป้ง; แผ่นหั่นเฟรนช์ฟรายส์; แผ่นใบมีดขูด; โถเครื่องทำไอศกรีม; หัวใบมีดแบบจูเลียน; ใบมีดนวดแป้ง; ชามขนาดเล็ก (ใส่ในชามใหญ่); แผ่นขูดชีสพาร์เมซาน; แผ่นปอกเปลือก; เครื่องปั่นสลัด; หัวใบมีดแบบเป็นซี่; แผ่นหั่น; แผ่นทำเส้นเกลียว; กล่องเก็บของ; แผ่นตีผสม (อิมัลซิฟาย); อื่นๆ
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα εξαρτήματα πολυκόφτη: Λεπίδα κοπής; Εξάρτημα αποχυμωτή εσπεριδοειδών; Σετ κοπής σε κύβους; Λεπίδα ζύμης; Δίσκος κοπής για πατάτες τηγανητές; Δίσκος τριψίματος; Κάδος παγωτομηχανής; Δίσκος ζουλιέν; Λεπίδα ζυμώματος; Ένθετο μίνι μπολ; Δίσκος παρμεζάνας; Δίσκος αποφλοίωσης; Στραγγιστήρας σαλάτας; Δίσκος τριψίματος; Δίσκος κοπής σε φέτες; Δίσκος κοπής σε σπιράλ; Θήκη φύλαξης; Δίσκος ανάδευσης/γαλακτωματοποίησης; Άλλο
vi: Các phụ kiện đi kèm máy chế biến thực phẩm: Lưỡi dao băm; Phụ kiện vắt cam quýt; Bộ phụ kiện cắt hạt lựu; Lưỡi dao trộn bột; Đĩa cắt khoai tây chiên; Đĩa bào; Âu làm kem; Đĩa thái sợi; Lưỡi nhào bột; Ngăn nhỏ lắp thêm; Đĩa bào phô mai Parmesan; Đĩa gọt vỏ; Rổ quay rau; Đĩa băm nhỏ; Đĩa thái lát; Đĩa cắt sợi rau củ; Hộp bảo quản; Đĩa đánh trứng/đĩa nhũ hóa; Khác
ko: 푸드 프로세서 포함 부속품: 다지기용 칼날; 감귤류 착즙기 부착 장치; 다이싱 키트; 반죽용 칼날; 감자튀김 디스크; 강판 디스크; 아이스크림 제조기 그릇; 채썰기용 디스크; 반죽용 칼날; 미니볼 인서트; 파마산 디스크; 필러 디스크; 야채 탈수기; 채썰기 디스크; 슬라이싱 디스크; 스파이럴라이저 디스크; 수납용 카트; 거품기/유화 디스크; 기타
zh-CN: 包括的食品加工机附件: 切碎刀片; 柑橘榨汁机配件; 切丁套件; 和面刀; 薯条盘; 刨丝盘; 冰淇淋机碗; 切丝盘; 揉面刀; 迷你碗嵌入件; 帕玛森奶酪盘; 削皮盘; 沙拉搅拌机; 刨丝盘; 切片盘; 螺旋切盘; 储物盒/储物箱; 打发/乳化盘; 其他
lt-LT: Virtuvinio kombaino priedai komplekte: Pjaustymo peilis; Citrusinių vaisių sulčių spaudimo antgalis; Pjaustymo rinkinys; Tešlos peilis; Gruzdintų bulvyčių diskas; Tarkavimo diskas; Ledų gaminimo aparato dubuo; Julienne pjaustymo diskas; Minkymo peilis; Mini dubenėlio įdėklas; Parmezano diskas; Lupimo diskas; Salotų džiovyklė; Smulkinimo diskas; Pjaustymo diskas; Spiralizatoriaus diskas; Sandėliavimo dėžės; Plakimo / emulsinis diskas; Kita
es: Accesorios de procesador de alimentos incluidos: Cuchilla de cortar; Accesorio exprimidor de cítricos; Kit para cortar en cubitos; Cuchilla para masa; Disco de patatas fritas; Disco rallador; Bol para hacer helados; Disc para corte en juliana; Cuchilla amasadora; Inserto para minibol; Disco de parmesano; Disco pelador; Escurridor de ensalada; Disco triturador; Disco para rebanar; Disco espiralizador; Estuche de almacenamiento; Batidor/disco emulsionante; Otros
fi: Mukana toimitettavat ruokakäsittelijän lisävarusteet: Leikkuuterä; Sitruspuristimen lisäosa; Kuutiointipakkaus; Taikinaterä; Ranskanperunalevy; Raastinlevy; Jäätelökoneen kulho; Julienne-levy; Vaivauslevy; Minikulhon sisäosa; Parmesaanilevy; Kuorintalevy; Salaattilinko; Raastinlevy; Viipalointilevy; Spiraalileikkuulevy; Säilytyslaatikko; Vaahdotus-/emulgointilevy; Muu
sv: Matberedartillbehör som ingår: Hackblad; Citruspresstillbehör; Tärningskit; Degblad; Pommes frites-skiva; Rivskiva; Skål till glassmaskin; Julienne-skiva; Knådningsblad; Miniskålinsats; Parmesanskiva; Skalningsskiva; Salladssnurra; Rivskiva; Skärskiva; Spiralskivare; Förvaringsväska; Visp / emulgeringsskiva; Övrigt
pt-PT: Acessórios para processador de alimentos incluídos: Lâmina de corte; Acessório para espremer citrinos; Kit para cortar em cubos; Lâmina de massa; Disco de batata frita; Disco de ralar; Taça para máquina de fazer gelados; Discos de corte para juliana; Lâmina de amassar; Encaixe para mini taça; Disco de parmesão; Disco descascador; Centrifugadora de saladas; Disco de trituração; Disco de corte; Disco espiralizador; Caixa de armazenamento; Batedeira/disco emulsionante; Outro
hu: Konyhai robotgép tartozékai: Aprítópenge; Citrusfacsaró tartozék; Kockázó készlet; Tésztavágó penge; Sült krumpli vágókorong; Reszelőkorong; Fagylaltkészítő tál; Julienne tárcsa; Dagasztólapát; Minitál betét; Parmezánreszelő korong; Hámozókorong; Salátacentrifuga; Aprítótárcsa; Szeletelőkorong; Spirálvágó korong; Tárolótok; Whisk/emulgeáló korong; Egyéb
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia sú nadstavce kuchynského robota: Sekacia čepeľ; Nadstavec na odšťavovanie citrusov; Súprava na krájanie na kocky; Lopatka na cesto; Kotúč na hranolky; Strúhací kotúč; Miska zmrzlinovača; Kotúč typu Julienne; Hnetacia lopatka; Vložka do mini misky; Kotúč na parmezán; Kotúče na šúpanie; Odstredivka na šalát; Drviaci kotúč; Kotúč na krájanie; Kotúč na špirálový krájač; Úložné puzdro; Kotúč na šľahanie/emulgáciu; Iné
ro-RO: Accesoriile pentru robotul de bucătărie incluse: Lamă de tocat; Accesoriu pentru storcător de citrice; Kit pentru cuburi; Lamă de aluat; Disc de cartofi prăjiți; Disc de răzuire; Bol pentru înghețată; Disc de tăiere julienne; Lamă de frământat; Inserție minibol; Disc de parmezan; Disc de decojit; Centrifugă de salată; Disc de mărunțire; Disc de feliere; Disc spiralizator; Cutie de depozitare; Tel/disc de emulsionare; Altele
ja: フードプロセッサー用付属アタッチメント: チョッピングブレード; 柑橘類ジューサーアタッチメント; 角切りキット; 生地ブレード; フライドポテトディスク; グレーティングディスク; アイスクリームメーカー用ボウル; 千切りディスク; こね用ブレード; ミニボウルインサート; パルメザンディスク; ピーラーディスク; サラダスピナー; 細切りディスク; スライスディスク; スパイラルカットディスク; 収納ケース; 泡立て/乳化ディスク; その他
da: Tilbehør til foodprocessor medfølger: Hakkeblad; Citruspressertilbehør; Sæt til at skære i tern; Dejblad; Pommes frites-skive; Riveskive; Skål til ismaskine; Julienne-disk; Blad til æltning; Miniskålindsats; Parmesanskive; Skrællerskive; Salatslynge; Riveskive; Skæreskive; Spiralskive; Opbevaringsetui; piske-/emulgeringsskive; Andet
bg-BG: Включени приставки за кухненски робот: Режещо острие; Приставка за сокоизстисквачка за цитруси; Комплект за нарязване на кубчета; Острие за тесто; Диск за пържени картофи; Диск за настъргване; Купа за машина за сладолед; Диск „Жулиен“; Приставка за месене; Мини купа; Диск за пармезан; Диск за белене; Центрофуга за салата; Диск за нарязване; Диск за рязане на тънко; Диск за спираловидно рязане; Кутия за съхранение; Бъркалка/диск за смесване; Друго
tr: Dahil olan mutfak robotu aparatları: Doğrama bıçağı; Narenciye sıkacağı aparatı; Küp doğrama kiti; Hamur bıçağı; Patates kızartması diski; Rende diski; Dondurma yapma kabı; Julienne diski; Yoğurma bıçağı; Mini kase eklentisi; Parmesan diski; Soyucu disk; Salata kurutucu; Doğrama diski; Dilimleme diski; Spiral kesici disk; Saklama kutusu; Çırpıcı / Emülsiyon diski; Diğer
nb: Inkludert tilbehør for kjøkkenmaskin: Hakkeblad; Sitruspressetilbehør; Terningsett; Deigblad; Pommes frites-plate; Riveskive; Maker; Julienne-plate; Elteblad; Mini-bolleinnsats; Parmesan-plate; Skrellerskive; Salatslynge; Riveskive; Skjæreskive; Spiralizer-skive; Oppbevaringsboks; Whisk/emulgeringsskive; Annet
fr: Accessoires inclus avec le robot culinaire: Lame de hachage; Accessoire presse-agrumes; Kit de dés; Lame à pâte; Disque de frites; Disque à râper; Bol pour glace; Disque à julienne; Lame de pétrissage; Insert pour mini-bol; Disque de parmesan; Disque éplucheur; Essoreuse à salade; Disque éminceur; Disque trancheur; Disque spiraliseur; Caisse de stockage; Disque fouet/émulsifiant; Autre
zh-TW: 食物調理機包含配件: 切碎刀片; 柑橘榨汁機配件; 切丁工具包; 切麵團刀; 薯條刀盤; 刨絲刀盤; 冰淇淋機碗; 切絲盤; 揉麵刀片; 迷你碗插件; 帕瑪森起司刀盤; 削皮刀盤; 沙拉蔬菜甩水器; 刨絲盤; 切片刀盤; 螺旋刨絲刀盤; 收納箱; 攪拌/乳化盤; 其他
nl: Meegeleverde accessoires voor voedselverwerkers: Hakmes; Citruspersaccessoire; Kit voor blokjes snijden; Deegmes; Frietschijf; Raspschijf; IJsroomkom; Julienneschijf; Kneedmes; Mini-kom inzetstuk; Parmezaanse schijf; Schilschijf; Slacentrifuge; Raspschijf; Snijschijf; Spiralizer-schijf; Opbergkoffer; Garde-/emulgeerschijf; Overig
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za prerađivač hrane: Oštrica za usitnjavanje; Nastavak za sokovnik citrusa; Komplet za rezanje na kockice; Lopatica za tijesto; Disk za pomfrit; Disk za ribanje; Posuda za aparat za sladoled; Disk za rezanje na julienne način; Lopatica za miješanje; Umetak za mini zdjelu; Disk za parmezan; Disk za ljuštenje; Posuda za sušenje salate; Disk za usitnjavanje; Disk za rezanje; Disk za spiralno rezanje; Kutija za pohranu; Disk za miješanje/emulgiranje; Ostalo
cs: Zahrnuté nástavce kuchyňského robota: Sekací nůž; Nástavec na odšťavňování citrusů; Sada pro krájení na kostičky; Nůž na těsto; Disk na hranolky; Strouhací disk; Mísa na výrobu zmrzliny; Kotouč na jemné nudličky (julienne); Hnětací nůž; Malá mísa do robotu; Strouhací disk na parmezán; Škrabací disk; Odstředivka na salát; Kotouč na strouhání; Krájecí disk; Spiralizační disk; Skladovací pouzdro; Šlehací/emulgační disk; Jiné
ru: Насадки в комплекте кухонного комбайна: Рубящий нож; Насадка-соковыжималка для цитрусовых; Набор для нарезки кубиками; Нож для теста; Диск для картофеля фри; Диск для натирания; Чаша мороженицы; Диск для соломки; Лезвие для замешивания; Вставная мини-миска; Диск для пармезана; Диск для чистки; Центрифуга для сушки зелени; Диск для измельчения; Диск для нарезки ломтями; Диск для нарезки спиралью; Кейс для хранения; Диск для взбивания и эмульгирования; Другое
it: Accessori per robot da cucina inclusi: Lama da taglio; Accessorio spremiagrumi; Kit per tagliare a dadini; Lama per impasto; Disco per patatine fritte; Disco per grattugia; Ciotola per gelatiera; Disco perJulienne; Lama impastatrice; Inserto per mini-ciotola; Disco per parmigiano; Disco pelapatate; Centrifuga per insalata; Disco trituratore; Disco per affettare; Disco spiralizzatore; Custodia; Frusta/disco emulsionante; Altro
sl-SI: Priloženi nastavki za kuhinjski robot: Rezilo za sekljanje; Priključek za stiskanje citrusov; Komplet za rezanje na kocke; Rezilo za testo; Disk za pomfrit; Rešetkasti disk; Posoda aparata za izdelavo sladoleda; Kolut za rezanje Julienne; Gnetenje; Vložek za mini skledo; Ploča za parmezan; Lupilni disk; Odcejalnik solate; Kolut za strganje; Rezalni disk; Spiralni disk; Pohištveni sestav za shranjevanje; Whisk/emulgator; Druga
en: Food processor attachments included: Chopping blade; Citrus juicer attachment; Dicing kit; Dough blade; French fry disc; Grating disc; Ice cream maker bowl; Julienne disc; Kneading blade; Mini-bowl insert; Parmesan disc; Peeler disc; Salad spinner; Shredding disc; Slicing disc; Spiralizer disc; Storage case; Whisk/emulsifying disc; Other